sk-SK: Počet nadhadzovacích kolies: 1-kolesový; 2-kolesový; 3-kolesový; Iné
th: จำนวนวงล้อหมุน: 1 ล้อ; 2 ล้อ; 3 ล้อ; อื่นๆ
el: Αριθμός τροχών εκτόξευσης: 1 ρόδα; 2 ρόδες; 3 ρόδες; Άλλο
tr: Atış makinesi tekerlek sayısı: 1 tekerlekli; 2 tekerlekli; 3 tekerlekli; Diğer
pt-BR: Máquina de arremesso número de rodas: 1 roda; 2 rodas; 3 rodas; Outros
de: Anzahl der Pitching-Räder: 1-Rad; 2-Rad; 3-Rad; Andere
sv: Antal pitchinghjul: 1 hjul; 2 hjul; 3 hjul; Övrigt
da: Antal pitchinghjul: 1 hjul; 2 hjul; 3 hjul; Andet
zh-TW: 投球輪數量: 單輪; 雙輪; 三輪; 其他
ru: Количество колес питчерной машины: 1 колесо; 2 колеса; 3 колеса; Другое
ko: 피칭 휠 수: 1휠; 2휠; 3휠; 기타
hr-HR: Broj kotača za bacanje: 1 kotač; 2 kotača; 3 kotača; Ostalo
fi: Heittolaitteen pyörien lukumäärä: 1-pyöräinen; 2-pyöräinen; 3-pyöräinen; Muu
sl-SI: Število koles metalnega stroja: 1 kolo; 2 kolesi; 3 kolesa; Drugo
it: Numero di ruote di lancio: 1 ruota; 2 ruote; 3 ruote; Altro
lt-LT: Metimo mašinos ratų skaičius: 1 ratuko; 2 ratukų; 3 ratukų; Kita
ro-RO: Numărul de roți de lansare: Cu 1 roată; Cu 2 roți; Cu 3 roți; Altele
fr: Nombre de roues de la machine de lancer: 1 roue; 2 roues; 3 roues; Autre
es: Número de ruedas de lanzamiento: De 1 rueda; De 2 ruedas; De 3 ruedas; Otra
ja: ピッチングホイール数: 1輪; 2輪; 3輪; その他
zh-CN: 投球机轮数: 单轮; 双轮; 三轮; 其他
nb: Antall kastehjul: 1-hjuls; 2-hjuls; 3-hjuls; Annet
vi: Số bánh xe quay: 1 bánh; 2 bánh; 3 bánh; Khác
pt-PT: contagem de rodas de inclinação: 1 roda; 2 rodas; 3 rodas; Outro
pl: Liczba kół maszyny do narzutu: 1-kołowa; 2-kołowa; 3-kołowa; Inna
hu: Dobókerék kerékszáma: 1 kerekes; 2 kerekes; 3 kerekes; Egyéb
en: Pitching wheel count: 1-wheel; 2-wheel; 3-wheel; Other
cs: Počet odpalovacích koleček: 1 kolo; 2 kola; 3 kola; Ostatní
bg-BG: Брой колела на уреда за хвърляне.: С 1 колело; С 2 колела; С 3 колела; Друго
nl: Werpmachine wielaantal: 1-wiel; 2-wiel; 3-wiel; Overig